cs: Technologie reproduktoru: Dynamické; Elektrostatické; Roh; Piezoelektrické; Planární magnetické; Inteligentní; Jiné
nl: Luidsprekertechnologie: Dynamisch; Elektrostatisch; Hoorn; Piëzo-elektrisch; Planar magnetic; Smart; Andere
zh-CN: 扬声器技术: 动圈式; 静电式; 喇叭; 压电式; 平面磁性; 智能; 其他
vi: Công nghệ loa: Động; Tĩnh điện; Kèn; Áp điện; Từ phẳng; Thông minh; Khác
pt-PT: Tecnologia do altifalante: Dinâmico; Eletrostático; Trompa; Piezoelétrico; Magnético plano; Inteligente; Outro
da: Højttalerteknologi: Dynamisk; Elektrostatisk; Horn; Piezoelektrisk; Planmagnetisk; Smart; Andet
th: เทคโนโลยีลำโพง: ไดนามิก; ไฟฟ้าสถิต; แตร; เพียโซอิเล็กทริก; แม่เหล็กแบบระนาบ; อัจฉริยะ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Technológia reproduktorov: Dynamický; Elektrostatický; Horn; Piezoelektrický; Planárny magnetický; Inteligentný; Iné
tr: Hoparlör Teknolojisi: Dinamik; Elektrostatik; Korno; Piezoelektrik; Düzlemsel manyetik; Akıllı; Diğer
nb: Høyttalerteknologi: Dynamisk; Elektrostatisk; Horn; Piezoelektrisk; Planmagnetisk; Smart; Annet
en: Speaker technology: Dynamic; Electrostatic; Horn; Piezoelectric; Planar magnetic; Smart; Other
ja: スピーカー技術: ダイナミック; 静電気; ホルン; 圧電式; 平面磁気; スマート; その他
pl: Technologia głośników: Dynamiczny; Elektrostatyczny; Róg; Zjawisko piezoelektryczne; Płaski magnetyczny; Inteligentny; Inne
it: Tecnologia della cassa: Dinamica; Elettrostatica; Megafono; Piezoelettrica; Magnetica planare; Smart; Altro
es: Tecnología de altavoces: Dinámico; Electrostático; Corneta; Piezoeléctrico; Planar magnético; Inteligente; Otros
sl-SI: Tehnologija zvočnikov: Dinamična; Elektrostatična; Rog; Piezoelektrična; Ravna magnetna; Pametna; Drugo
sv: Högtalarteknik: Dynamisk; Elektrostatisk; Horn; Piezoelektrisk; Planmagnetisk; Smart; Övrigt
ru: Технология динамика: Динамический; Электростатический; Звуковой сигнал; Пьезоэлектрический; Планарно-магнитный; Умный; Другое
zh-TW: 揚聲器技術: 動圈式; 靜電; 號; 壓電式; 平面磁; 智慧; 其他
lt-LT: Garsiakalbio technologija: Dinaminis; Elektrostatinis; Rago formos; Pjezoelektrinis; Plokščiasis magnetinis; Išmanus; Kita
hr-HR: Tehnologija zvučnika: Dinamički; Elektrostatski; Rog; Piezoelektrični; Planarni magnetostatski; Pametni; Ostalo
ko: 스피커 기술: 다이나믹; 정전기; 호른; 압전; 평면 자기; 스마트; 기타
ro-RO: Tehnologie difuzor: Dinamic; Electrostatic; Corn; Piezoelectric; Magnetic planar; Smart; Altele
de: Lautsprechertechnologie: Dynamisch; Elektrostatisch; Horn; Piezoelectric; Planarmagnetisch; Smart; Sonstiges
fr: Technologie du haut-parleur: Dynamique; Électrostatique; Corne; Piézoélectrique; Magnétique planaire; Intelligent; Autre
fi: Kaiutinteknologia: Dynaaminen; Sähköstaattinen; Torvi; Pietsosähköinen; Tasomagneettinen; Älykäs; Muu
bg-BG: Технология на високоговорител: Динамичен; Електростатичен; Рупор; Пиезоелектрически; Планарен магнитен; Смарт; Други
el: Τεχνολογία ηχείων: Δυναμικό; Ηλεκτροστατικό; Κέρατο; Πιεζοηλεκτρικό; Επίπεδη μαγνητική; Εξυπνος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tecnologia do alto-falante: Dinâmico; Eletrostático; Buzina; Piezoelétrico; Magnético plano; Inteligente; Outro
hu: Hangszóró technológiája: Dinamikus; Elektrosztatikus; Kürt; Piezoelektromos; Síkmágneses; Intelligens; Egyéb